Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5581YH (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2056 Section 1. Section 155A.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10A. âDepartmentâ means the department of 3 public health. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 45A. âStanding orderâ means a preauthorized 5 medication order with specific instructions from the medical 6 director of the department to dispense a medication under 7 clearly defined circumstances. 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 155A.49 Pharmacist dispensing 9 of hydroxychloroquine and ivermectin ââ standing order ââ 10 requirements ââ limitations of liability. 11 1. The medical director of the department shall establish a 12 standing order authorizing the dispensing of hydroxychloroquine 13 and ivermectin by a pharmacist. 14 2. a. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 15 a pharmacist shall dispense hydroxychloroquine or ivermectin 16 to a patient who is at least eighteen years of age, upon the 17 request of a patient, pursuant to a standing order established 18 by the medical director of the department in accordance with 19 this section. 20 b. A pharmacist who dispenses hydroxychloroquine or 21 ivermectin in accordance with this section shall provide the 22 patient with the manufacturerâs label instructions for the drug 23 at the time the drug is dispensed. 24 c. A pharmacist who dispenses hydroxychloroquine or 25 ivermectin in accordance with this section shall not do any of 26 the following: 27 (1) Require any other prescription drug order authorized 28 by a practitioner or require the scheduling of an appointment 29 with the pharmacist prior to the dispensing of the 30 hydroxychloroquine or ivermectin to a patient. 31 (2) Maintain a record of the pharmacistâs encounter with the 32 patient. 33 3. A pharmacist who dispenses hydroxychloroquine or 34 ivermectin and the medical director of the department 35 -1- LSB 5581YH (2) 91 ss/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 2056 who establishes a standing order in compliance with this 1 section shall be immune from criminal and civil liability 2 arising from any damages caused by the dispensing or use of 3 hydroxychloroquine or ivermectin or the establishment of the 4 standing order. The medical director of the department shall 5 be considered to be acting within the scope of the medical 6 directorâs office and employment for purposes of chapter 669 in 7 the establishment of a standing order in compliance with this 8 section. 9